en: pepper mix
ro: mix de piper

en: peppercorns
da: peberkorn
de: Pfefferkörner
es: pimienta en grano
fi: Pippureita
fr: grains de poivre
hr: papar u zrnu
it: grani di pepe
sv: pepparkorn

en: pepper extract
de: Pfefferextrakt
es: extracto de pimienta
fi: pippuriuute
fr: extrait de poivre
it: estratto di pepe
nl: peperextract
pl: ekstrakt pieprzu
pt: extrato de pimenta, extracto de pimenta
sv: pepparextrakt

fr: extrait naturel de poivre
fi: luontainen pippuriuute

en: black and white pepper
da: sort og hvid peber
de: schwarzer und weißer Pfeffer
fi: musta- ja valkopippuri
fr: Poivres noir et blanc
hr: bijeli biber
it: pepe nero e bianco
nl: zwarte en witte peper
sv: svart- och vitpeppar, svart och vit peppar

en: long pepper
bg: дълъг пипер
it: pepe lungo

en: white pepper
ar: فلفل أبيض
bg: бял пипер
ca: pebre blanc
cs: pepř bílý, bílý pepř
da: hvid peber
de: weißer Pfeffer, weisser Pfeffer, Pfeffer weiß
el: λευκό πιπέρι
es: pimienta blanca
et: valge pipar
eu: piperrauts zuri
fi: valkopippuri
fr: poivre blanc
ga: piobar bán
hr: bijeli papor
hu: fehérbors, fehér bors
id: lada putih
it: pepe bianco
ja: 白胡椒, 白コショウ, 白こしょう, ホワイトペッパー
nb: hvit pepper
nl: witte peper
os: урс бырц
pl: pieprz biały, biały pieprz
pt: pimenta-branca, pimenta branca
ru: перец белый, белый перец
sl: beli poper
sv: vitpeppar, vit peppar
uk: перець білий
zh: 胡椒粉

en: green pepper, green peppercorns, green peppercorn
bg: зелен пипер
de: grüner Pfeffer
es: pimienta verde
fi: viherpippuri
fr: poivre vert
hr: zeleni papar
it: Peperone verde
nl: groene peper
pl: zielony pieprz, pieprz zielony
sv: grönpeppar

en: grey pepper, gray pepper
de: Grauer Pfeffer
fr: poivre gris
hr: sivi papar
it: pepe grigio
nl: grijze peper

en: black pepper
ar: فلفل أسود
bg: черен пипер
bs: crni biber
ca: Pebre negre, Pebre negre molt
cs: pepř černý, černý pepř
da: sort peber
de: schwarzer Pfeffer, Pfeffer schwarz
el: μαύρο πιπέρι
eo: nigra pipro
es: pimienta negra
et: must pipar
fi: mustapippuri
fr: poivre noir
ga: piobar dubh
hr: crni papar, papar crni, plod crnog papra, piper nigrum
hu: feketebors, fekete bors
it: pepe nero
ja: 黒胡椒, 黒こしょう, 黒コショウ, ブラックペッパー
kk: қара бұрыш
lt: juodieji piperai
lv: melnie pipari
nb: svart pepper, piper nigrum, sort pepper
nl: zwarte peper
nn: svart pepper
pl: czarny pieprz, pieprz czarny
pt: pimenta preta, pimenta-negra
ro: piper negru
ru: Черный перец, перец черный, перец чёрный
sk: čierne korenie
sl: črni poper
sv: svartpeppar, svart peppar
tr: karabiber
uk: перець чорний
zh: 黑胡椒

en: black peppercorns
de: schwarze Pfefferkörner
es: pimienta negra en grano
fi: Kokonainen mustapippuri, kokonaisia mustapippureita, kokonaiset mustapippurit
fr: graines de poivre noir, poivre noir en grains
hr: zrna crnog papra, papar crni zrno
it: pepe nero in grani
nl: zwarte peperkorrels

en: cracked black pepper
de: zerstoßener schwarzer Pfeffer, schwarzer Pfeffer zerstoßen
fi: mustapippurirouhe, rouhittu mustapippuri
fr: poivre noir concassé
hr: mljeveni crni papar
it: Pepe nero macerato
nl: grove zwarte peper
ro: piper negru măcinat
ru: перец черный молотый, перец-чёрный-молотый
uk: перець чорний мелений

en: black pepper powder
bg: черен пипер на прах

en: black pepper extract
bg: екстракт от черен пипер
de: schwarzer Pfefferextrakt
es: extracto de pimienta negra
fi: mustapippuriuute
fr: extrait de poivre noir
hr: ekstrakt crnog papra
it: Estratto di pepe nero
nl: zwarte peperextract, zwartepeperextract
sv: svartpepparextrakt

en: black and green pepper, green and black pepper
fi: musta- ja viherpippuri
it: pepe nero e verde

en: colorful pepper
hr: šareni papar
it: pepe colorato
pl: pieprz kolorowy

en: condiment
am: ܐܨܪܐ
ar: توابل
az: Çeşni
be: смакавыя дабаўкі
bg: подправка, подправки
ca: condiment
cs: ochucovadlo
cy: Cyfwyd
da: smagspræparat
de: Würzmittel
el: Καρύκευμα
eo: kondimento
es: condimento, condimentos
eu: ongailu
fa: چاشنی
fi: maustekastike
fr: condiment, condiments, assaisonnement
ga: Blastán
gl: condimento
he: רוטב לתיבול
hu: Fűszer
hy: համեմունք
id: Bahan penyedap
io: Kondimento
it: condimento
ja: 調味料
kk: Дәмқосар
ko: 조미료
lv: garšviela
ms: Bumbu
nn: smakstilsetjing
oc: condiment
pl: przyprawa, przyprawy, przyprawy aromatyczno-smakowe
pt: condimento
ro: Mirodenie, condimente, condiment
ru: приправы
sv: smaktillsats, smaksättare, smaksättning
tr: Çeşni
uk: Смакові добавки
vi: Phụ gia
zh: 食品添加剂

en: powdered condiment
bg: Подправка на пудра, подправки на пудра
de: Streuwürze
es: Condimento en polvo
fi: Jauhemainen mauste
fr: condiment en poudre, condiments en poudre
hr: začin u prahu
it: condimento in polvere

en: mixed condiments, seasoning blend, seasoning mix, flavored seasoning
bg: смес от подправки, подправъчна смес
de: Würzmischung
es: Condimentos varios
fi: maustesekoitus
fr: mélange de condiments, assaisonnement aromatisé, mélange aromatique
hr: miješani začini
it: condimenti misti
pl: mix przyprawowy, mieszanka przypraw aromatyczno-smakowych

en: barbecue seasoning
de: Grillgewürz
es: aderezo barbacoa, aderezo a barbacoa, salsa barbacoa
fr: assaisonnement saveur barbecue
hr: začin za roštilj
it: condimento per barbecue